Tennessee, session 114, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 69, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department shall not apply criteria that will result in the classification of real
property as a wetland where the property is classified as prior converted cropland that is
exempt from classification as a wetland under federal law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1072
002870
- 1 -